Illinois, session 104th, HB3260.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 45-10 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/45-10)7    Sec. 45-10. Political party caucus in township; notice. 8    (a) On the first Tuesday in December preceding the date of 9the regular township election, a caucus shall be held by the 10voters of each established political party in a township to 11nominate its candidates for the various offices to be filled 12at the election. Notice of the caucus shall be given at least 1320 10 days before it is held by publication in some newspaper 14having a general circulation in the township. Not less than 45 1530 days before the caucus, the township clerk shall notify the 16chairman or membership of each township central committee by 17first-class mail of the chairman's or membership's obligation 18to report the time and location of the political party's 19caucus. Not less than 30 20 days before the caucus, each 20chairman of the township central committee shall notify the 21township clerk by first-class mail of the time and location of 22the political party's caucus. If the time and location of 2 or 23more political party caucuses conflict, the township clerk   HB3260- 2 -LRB104 09081 RTM 19137 b1shall establish, by a fair and impartial public lottery, the 2time and location for each caucus.3    If the chairperson of the township central committee fails 4to meet within the township or to meet any of the other 5requirements of this Section, the chairperson's political 6party shall not be permitted to nominate a candidate, either 7by caucus as provided for in this Section or as otherwise 8authorized by the Election Code, in the next upcoming 9consolidated election for any office for which a nomination 10could have been made at the caucus should the chairperson of 11the township central committee have met the requirements of 12this Section. 13    (b) Except as provided in this Section, the township board 14shall cause notices of the caucuses to be published. The 15notice shall state the time and place where the caucus for each 16political party will be held. The board shall fix a place 17within the township for holding the caucus for each 18established political party. When a new township has been 19established under Section 10-25, the county board shall cause 20notice of the caucuses to be published as required by this 21Section and shall fix the place within the new township for 22holding the caucuses.23(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.)